Maine, session 132, LD636.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §708, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §100, is further
amended to read:
2. Wholesale licensees. A wholesale licensee may not offer to retail licensees any
special discounts, volume discounts, depletion allowances, other reduced prices or
discounts, or refunds except bona fide price reductions under section 1408 offered to all
retail licensees. A Except as provided in this section, a wholesale licensee may not offer
any free merchandise, rebate, refund or gift to a purchaser of malt liquor or wine.
Sec. 2. 28-A MRSA §708, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §100, is further
amended to read:
This section does not prohibit the unconditional distribution of merchandise to an
on-premises retail licensee from a licensed in-state or out-of-state manufacturer or
wholesaler of malt liquor or wine, a certificate of approval holder or a wholesale licensee
or to the patrons of an on-premises establishment.